Arkansas, session 2025, HB1294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-13-108, concerning ambulance services
and the ability to treat in place if the ambulance service is coordinating
care through telemedicine, is amended to add an additional subsection to read
as follows:
(c) A licensed ambulance service, in coordination with the medical
director of the licensed ambulance service, may order durable medical
equipment or outpatient services for a patient without a referral from a
physician.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-79-2703(a)(1), concerning insurance
*JMB040*
01/29/2025 1:05:26 PM JMB040

HB1294
coverage for ambulance services to triage and transport a health benefit plan
enrollee to an alternative destination or treat in place, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) Order durable medical equipment or outpatient services
for an enrollee without a referral from a physician; or































01/29/2025 1:05:26 PM JMB040